Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 24 Organization and Corporate Procedures of Legal Reserve Stockand Mutual Insurers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 66 to 88.

44 C.J.S. Insurance § 110; 46A C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1447, 1516.

§ 26-24-101.
Scope and applicability of chapter.

This chapter applies only to domestic stock insurers and domestic mutual insurers transacting or proposing to transact insurance on the cash premium or legal reserve plan, except that W.S.

26-24-115

,

26-24-130

and

26-24-136

also apply to foreign and alien insurers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 463; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-463; W.S. 1977, §

26-29-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-102.
Applicability of general corporation statutes; exceptions.

The applicable provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act [§

17-16-101

et seq.] apply to domestic stock and domestic mutual insurers, except as in conflict with the express provisions of this code [title 26] and the reasonable implications thereof.

Domestic stock insurers and domestic mutual insurers are exempt from the provisions of W.S.

17-16-1630

and 17-16-1720(e).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 464; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-464; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-102; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and (f)” at the end of (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted "W.S.

17-16-1630

and 17-16-1720(e)" for "W.S.

17-16-1630

and 17-16-1820(e)."

§ 26-24-103.
Incorporation generally.

This section applies to stock and mutual insurers incorporated in this state.

Five (5) or more individuals may incorporate a stock insurer. Ten (10) or more individuals may incorporate a mutual insurer. At least a majority of the incorporators shall be citizens of the United States. At least a majority of the incorporators shall be residents of this state.

The incorporators shall sign and verify in triplicate articles of incorporation in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act [§

17-16-101

et seq.], but subject to the following requirements:

The name of the corporation shall comply with W.S.

26-3-106

. If a mutual insurer, “mutual” shall be included in the name. An alternative name may be specified for use in jurisdictions in which conflict of name with that of another insurer or organization might otherwise prevent the insurer from being authorized to transact insurance therein;

The purposes of the corporation shall be limited to the transaction of one (1) or more kinds of insurance, as defined in this code [title 26], and the corporation does not have power to engage in any other or additional business, except that a title insurer may engage in the title abstract business and escrow business;

If a stock corporation, the capital stock must consist entirely of common stock of one (1) uniform class, par value not less than one dollar ($1.00) per share, each outstanding share of which has equal rights in every respect with every other share, and shares without par value shall not be authorized;

If a mutual corporation, the articles of incorporation shall state the maximum contingent liability of members for payment of losses and expenses incurred, other than as to nonassessable policies issued as permitted under W.S.

26-24-137

, but the liability shall not be less than one (1) nor more than six (6) annual premiums for the member’s policy;

The corporation’s initial board of directors, as provided for in the articles of incorporation, shall consist of not less than five (5) members;

The articles of incorporation shall specify which, if any, of the incorporators are not citizens of the United States of America or are not residents of this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 465; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-465; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-103; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to types of insurance, see §§

26-5-101

through

26-5-111

.

§ 26-24-104.
Articles of incorporation; generally; filing; approval procedure.

The incorporators of a proposed domestic insurer shall deliver the triplicate originals of the articles of incorporation to the commissioner. The commissioner shall deliver one (1) of the originals to the attorney general of this state, and the attorney general shall examine the articles. If the attorney general finds that the articles comply with law, he shall so certify and return the certificate and the original articles of incorporation to the commissioner.

If the attorney general approves the articles of incorporation, the commissioner shall also endorse his approval upon each set of the articles and return them, together with the attorney general’s certificate, to the incorporators. The incorporators shall then file one (1) set of the articles of incorporation with the secretary of state, one (1) set with the commissioner bearing the certification of the secretary of state and shall retain the third set in the corporate records. For the filing of articles of incorporation of a mutual insurer, the secretary of state shall charge and collect a filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), which shall be credited to the general fund.

If the attorney general finds that the proposed articles do not comply with the law, he shall refuse to approve them and shall return the set thereof to the commissioner, together with a written statement of the respects in which he finds the articles do not comply. The commissioner shall then return all sets of the proposed articles to the proposed incorporators together with the attorney general’s written statement.

The secretary of state shall not permit the filing in that office of any articles of incorporation unless they bear the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

The approval of the attorney general or commissioner relates only to the form and contents of the articles of incorporation and does not constitute approval or commitment as to any other aspect or operation of the proposed insurer.

The attorney general and the commissioner shall perform all duties required of them under this section within a reasonable time after the articles of incorporation have been submitted to the commissioner as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 466; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-466; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-104; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-105.
Articles of incorporation; amendment by stock insurers.

A domestic stock insurer may amend its articles of incorporation for any lawful purpose through the same procedures prescribed in the Wyoming Business Corporation Act [§

17-16-101

et seq.] as for business corporations in general.

Triplicate originals of articles of amendment shall be delivered to the commissioner and are subject to the same examination, certification, approval and filing procedures as provided under W.S.

26-24-104

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 467; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-467; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-105; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-106.
Articles of incorporation; amendment by mutual insurers.

A domestic mutual insurer may amend its articles of incorporation for any lawful purpose by affirmative vote of a majority of the members present or represented by proxy at any regular annual meeting of its members, or at any special meeting of members called for the purpose. Written notices of the proposed amendment shall be given members at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting and may be given in the same manner and at the same time as notice of the meeting is given or in any other appropriate manner.

Upon adoption of the amendment the insurer shall prepare articles of amendment in triplicate under its corporate seal, setting forth the amendment and the date and manner of the adoption thereof. The articles of amendment shall be executed by the insurer’s president or vice-president and secretary or assistant secretary, and be acknowledged by them before an officer authorized by law to take acknowledgements of deeds.

The triplicate originals of the articles of amendment shall be delivered to the commissioner and are subject to the same examination, certification, approval and filing procedures as provided for original articles of incorporation under W.S.

26-24-104

. For filing articles of amendment of the articles of incorporation of a domestic mutual insurer the secretary of state shall charge and collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00), which shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 468; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-468; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-106; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision as to officers authorized to take acknowledgment of deeds, see §

34-1-113

.

§ 26-24-107.
Stock of domestic insurer to be paid for in cash; exceptions.

Except where issued in exchange for other securities for purposes of merger, bulk reinsurance, acquisition of control of another insurer as provided for in this chapter or as stock dividend on a split of stock, no domestic stock insurer shall issue its shares except upon payment in full of the subscription price thereof, not less than par value, in cash.

The value at which any such consideration, other than money, shall be carried in the insurer’s financial statement shall be determined as provided in W.S.

26-6-301

through

26-6-304

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 469; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-469; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-107; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-108.
Domestic insurers to engage in insurance business exclusively; exception as to title insurers.

No domestic insurer shall engage in any business other than the insurance business and activities reasonably and necessarily incidental thereto, except that a title insurer may also engage in the title abstracting business and act as an escrow agent.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 470; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-470; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-108; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-109.
Initial requirements of domestic mutual insurers; authorized transactions.

If newly organized, a domestic mutual insurer may be authorized to transact any one (1) of the kinds of insurance listed in the schedule in subsection (b) of this section.

When applying for an original certificate of authority, the insurer shall:

Be otherwise qualified therefor under this code [title 26];

Have received and accepted bona fide applications as to substantial insurable subjects for insurance coverage of a substantial character of the kind of insurance proposed to be transacted;

Have collected in cash the full premium therefor at a rate not less than that usually charged by other insurers for comparable coverages; and

Have surplus funds on hand and deposited as of the date the insurance coverages become effective; or

Instead of the applications, premiums and surplus, deposit and thereafter maintain surplus in accordance with that part of the following schedule which applies to the one (1) kind of insurance the insurer proposes to transact:

(b) (c) (d) (e) (f) (g) (h) Kind of insurance Min. No. of Apps. Accepted Min. No. Subjects Covered Minimum Premium Collected Min. Amt. Ins. ea. Subject Max. Amt. Ins. ea. Subject (v) Deposit of Min. Surplus Funds (vi) Deposit of Surplus in Lieu (vi) Life (i) 200 200 Annual $1,000 $2,500 $50,000 $150,000 Disability (ii) 200 200 Quarterly $10 (Weekly Indem.) $25 (Weekly Indem.) $50,000 $150,000 Property (iii) 100 250 Annual $1,000 $3,000 $50,000 $200,000 Casualty (iv) excluding surety & worker’s compensation 150 200 Annual $1,000 $10,000 $100,000 $200,000 Casualty with worker’s compensation 200 500 Quarterly $1,000 $10,000 $150,000 $250,000

Click to view

In addition to surplus deposited and thereafter to be maintained as shown in columns (g) or (h) of the schedule provided in paragraph (b)(v) of this section, the insurer when first authorized shall have on hand surplus funds, which it can thereafter expend in the conduct of its business, in an amount not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of the deposited surplus required of it under the schedule, whichever is larger.

The following provisions are applicable to the schedule provided in paragraph (b)(v) of this section and provisions as indicated by like roman numerals appearing in that schedule:

No group insurance or term policies for terms of less than ten (10) years shall be included;

No group, blanket or family plans of insurance shall be included. Instead of weekly indemnity a like premium value in medical, surgical and hospital benefits may be provided. Any accidental death or dismemberment benefit provided shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00);

Only insurance of the owner’s interest in real property may be included;

Casualty insurance shall include insurance of legal liability for bodily injury and property damage, to which the maximum and minimum insured amounts apply;

The maximums provided for in column (f) of the schedule are net of applicable reinsurance;

The deposit of surplus in the amount specified in columns (g) and (h) of the schedule shall thereafter be maintained unimpaired. The deposit is subject to chapter 8 of this code.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 471; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-471; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-109; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-110.
Bond or deposit required of domestic mutual insurers.

Before soliciting any applications for insurance required under W.S.

26-24-109

as qualifications for the original certificate of authority, the incorporators of the proposed insurer shall file with the commissioner a corporate surety bond in the penalty of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00), in favor of the state and for the use and benefit of the state of the applicant members and creditors of the corporation. The bond shall be conditioned for:

The prompt return to applicant members of all premiums collected in advance;

Payment of all indebtedness of the corporation; and

Payment of costs incurred by the state in case of any legal proceedings for liquidation or dissolution of the corporation, if the corporation fails to complete its organization and secure a certificate of authority within one (1) year from the date of its certificate of incorporation.

Instead of the bond specified in subsection (a) of this section, the incorporators may deposit with the commissioner fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) in cash or United States government bonds, negotiable and payable to the bearer, with a market value at all times of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00), to be held in trust upon the same conditions as required for the bond.

Any bond filed or deposit or remaining portion thereof held under this section shall be released and discharged upon settlement and termination of all liabilities against it.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 472; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-472; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-110; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-111.
Applications for domestic mutual insurance; solicitation by licensed agents.

Upon receipt of the commissioner’s approval of the bond or deposit as provided in W.S.

26-24-110

, the directors and officers of the proposed domestic mutual insurer may commence solicitation of the requisite applications for insurance policies and may receive deposits of premiums thereon.

The applications shall be in writing signed by the applicant, covering subjects of insurance resident, located or to be performed in this state.

All applications shall provide that:

Issuance of the policy is contingent upon the insurer qualifying for and receiving a certificate of authority;

No insurance is in effect until the certificate of authority is issued; and

The prepaid premium or deposit, and membership or policy fee, if any, shall be refunded in full to the applicant if organization is not completed and the certificate of authority is not issued and received by the insurer before a specified date which shall be not later than one (1) year after the date of the certificate of incorporation.

All qualifying premiums collected shall be in cash.

Solicitation for qualifying applicants for insurance shall be by licensed agents of the corporation, and the commissioner, upon the corporation’s application therefor, shall issue temporary agent’s licenses expiring on the date specified pursuant to paragraph (c)(iii) of this section to individuals qualified as for a resident agent’s license except as to the taking or passing of an examination. The commissioner may suspend or revoke any license for any of the causes and pursuant to the same procedures as are applicable to suspension or revocation of licenses of agents in general under chapter 9 of this code [title 26].

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 473; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-473; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-111; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-112.
Deposit in trust of premiums collected by mutual insurer; release upon issuance of certificate of authority.

All sums collected by a domestic mutual corporation as premiums or fees on qualifying applications for insurance therein shall be deposited in trust in a bank or trust company in this state under a written trust agreement consistent with this section and with W.S. 26-24-111(c)(iii) and

26-24-113

. The corporation shall file an executed copy of the trust agreement with the commissioner.

Upon issuance to the corporation of a certificate of authority as an insurer for the kind of insurance for which the applications were solicited, all funds held in trust become the insurer’s funds, and the insurer shall thereafter in due course issue and deliver its policies for which premiums were paid and accepted. The insurance provided by the policies is effective as of the date of the certificate of authority or thereafter as the policies provide.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 474; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-474; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-112; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-113.
Failure of domestic mutual insurer to qualify.

If the proposed domestic insurer fails to complete its organization and to secure its original certificate of authority within one (1) year from the date of its certificate of incorporation, its corporate powers cease, and the commissioner shall return or cause to be returned to the persons entitled thereto all advance deposits or payments of premiums held in trust under W.S.

26-24-112

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 475; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-475; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-113; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-114.
Additional kinds of insurance mutuals.

After being authorized to transact one (1) kind of insurance, a mutual insurer may be authorized to transact any additional kinds of insurance as are permitted under W.S.

26-3-107

, while otherwise in compliance with this code [title 26] and while maintaining unimpaired surplus funds in an amount not less than the amount of paid-in capital stock and surplus required to be maintained by a domestic stock insurer transacting the same kinds of insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 476; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-476; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-114; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-115.
Membership in mutuals.

Each policyholder of a domestic mutual insurer, other than a reinsurance contract, is a member of the insurer with all rights and obligations of the membership, and the policy shall so specify.

Any person, government or governmental agency, state or political subdivision thereof, public or private corporation, board, association, firm, estate, trustee or fiduciary may be a member of a domestic, foreign or alien mutual insurer. Any officer, stockholder, trustee or legal representative of any such corporation, board, association or estate may be recognized as acting for or on its behalf for the purpose of the membership, and is not personally liable upon any contract of insurance for acting in that representative capacity.

Any domestic corporation may participate as a member of a mutual insurer as an incidental purpose for which the corporation is organized, and as such is granted the rights and powers expressly conferred.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 477; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-477; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-115; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-116.
Bylaws of mutuals.

A domestic mutual insurer shall have bylaws for the government of its affairs. The insurer’s initial board of directors shall adopt original bylaws, subject to the approval of the insurer’s members at the next meeting of members.

The bylaws shall contain provisions, consistent with this code, relating to:

The voting rights of members;

Election of directors, and the number, qualifications, terms of office and powers of directors;

Annual and special meetings of members;

The number, designation, election, terms and powers and duties of the corporate officers;

Deposit, custody, disbursement and accounting for corporate funds;

Fidelity bonds covering any officers and employees of the insurer handling its funds, to be issued by a corporate surety and to be in an amount as may be reasonable; and

Any other matters as may be customary, necessary or convenient for the management or regulation of corporate affairs.

The insurer shall promptly file with the commissioner a copy, certified by the insurer’s secretary, of its bylaws and of every modification thereof or addition thereto. The commissioner, after a hearing held thereon, shall disapprove any bylaw provision he deems unlawful, unreasonable, inadequate, unfair or detrimental to the proper interests or protection of the insurer’s members or any class thereof. The insurer, after receiving written notice of disapproval and during the existence of that disapproval, shall not carry out any bylaw provision disapproved.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 478; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-478; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-116; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to commissioner's hearings generally, see §§

26-2-125

through

26-2-129

.

§ 26-24-117.
Meetings of members of domestic mutual insurers; where held; annual meeting.

Meetings of members of a domestic mutual insurer shall be held in the city or town of its registered office in this state, except as may otherwise be provided in the insurer’s bylaws with the commissioner’s approval.

Each domestic mutual insurer, during each calendar year shall:

Hold the annual meeting of its members to fill vacancies existing or occurring in the board of directors;

Receive and consider reports of the insurer’s officers as to its affairs; and

Transact any other business as may properly be brought before it.

Written notice of the time and place of the annual meeting of members shall be given members not less than thirty (30) days prior to the meeting. Notice may be given by imprinting the notice plainly on the policies issued by the insurer or in any other appropriate manner. Any change of the date or place of the annual meeting shall be made only by an annual meeting of members. Notice of any change, among other appropriate methods, may be given:

By imprinting the new date or place on all policies which will be in effect as of the date of the changed meeting; or

Unless the commissioner otherwise orders, through policies issued after the date of the annual meeting at which the change was made and in premium notices and renewal certificates issued during the twenty-four (24) months immediately following the meeting.

If the required annual meeting of members has not been held during the previous calendar year, the commissioner, upon written request of any officer, director or member of the insurer, shall cause written notice of the meeting to be given to the insurer’s members, and the meeting shall be held as soon as reasonably possible thereafter.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 479; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-479; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-117; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1996, ch. 40, § 1.

§ 26-24-118.
Meetings of members of domestic mutual insurers; special meetings.

A special meeting of the members of a mutual insurer may be held for any lawful purpose. The meeting shall be called by the corporate secretary pursuant to request of the insurer’s president or of its board of directors, or upon request in writing signed by not less than one-tenth (1/10) of the insurer’s members. The meeting shall be held at such time as the secretary may fix, but not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days after receipt of the request. If the secretary fails to issue the call, the president, directors or members making the request may do so.

Not less than ten (10) days written notice of the meeting shall be given. Notice addressed to the insurer’s members at their post office addresses last of record with the insurer and deposited, postage prepaid, in a letter depository of the United States post office, is deemed to have been given when so mailed. Instead of a mailed notice the insurer may publish the notice in any publication as shall afford a majority of its members a reasonable opportunity to have actual advance notice of the meeting. The notice shall state the purposes of the meeting, and no business shall be transacted at the meeting of which notice was not so given.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 480; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-480; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-118; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-119.
Voting rights of members of mutual insurers.

Each member of a mutual insurer is entitled to one (1) vote upon each matter coming to a vote at meetings of members.

A member has the right to vote in person or by his written proxy filed with the corporate secretary not less than five (5) days prior to the meeting. No proxy shall be made irrevocable, nor be valid beyond the earlier of the following dates:

The date of expiration set forth in the proxy; or

The date of termination of membership; or

Five (5) years from the date of execution of the proxy.

No member’s vote upon any proposal to divest the insurer of its business or assets, or the major part thereof, shall be registered or taken except in person or by proxy newly executed and specific as to the matter to be voted upon.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 481; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-481; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-119; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-120.
Information to stockholders of domestic stock insurers; proxy regulations.

This section applies to all domestic stock insurers except:

A domestic stock insurer having less than one hundred (100) stockholders, except that if ninety-five percent (95%) or more of the insurer’s stock is owned or controlled by a parent or affiliated insurer, this section does not apply to that insurer unless its remaining shares are held by five hundred (500) or more stockholders;

Domestic stock insurers which file with the securities and exchange commission forms of proxies, consents and authorizations pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.), as amended.

Any domestic stock insurer subject to this section shall seasonably furnish its stockholders in advance of stockholders meetings, information in writing reasonably adequate to inform them of all matters to be presented by the insurer’s management for consideration of stockholders at the meeting.

No person shall solicit a proxy, consent or authorization in respect of any stock of a domestic stock insurer subject to this section unless he furnishes the person solicited with written information reasonably adequate as to:

The material matters in regard to which the powers solicited are proposed to be used; and

The persons on whose behalf the solicitation is made, and the interest of the persons in relation to those matters.

No person shall furnish to another, information which the informer knows or has reason to believe is false or misleading as to any material fact, or which fails to state any material fact reasonably necessary to prevent any other statement made from being misleading.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the form of all proxies shall:

Conspicuously state on whose behalf the proxy is solicited;

Provide for dating the proxy;

Impartially identify each matter or group of related matters intended to be acted upon;

Provide means for the principal to instruct the vote of his shares as to approval or disapproval of each matter or group, other than election to office; and

Be legibly printed, with context suitably organized.

A proxy may confer discretionary authority:

As to matters in which choice is not specified pursuant to paragraph (e)(iv) of this section, if the form conspicuously states how it is intended to vote the proxy or authorization in each such case; and

As to other matters which may come before the meeting but unknown for a reasonable time prior to the solicitation by the persons on whose behalf the solicitation is made.

No proxy shall confer authority to vote:

For election of any person to any office for which a bona fide nominee is not named in the proxy statement; or

In any annual meeting, or adjournment thereof, other than the annual meeting immediately following the date on which the proxy statement and form are furnished stockholders.

The commissioner may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the purpose of this section, and in so doing shall consider rules and regulations promulgated for similar purposes by the insurance supervisory officials of other states.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 482; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-482; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-120; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Remedies in private civil actions under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78(a)) and SEC rules thereunder—post-1975 cases, 128 ALR Fed 387.

Causation in private civil actions by minority shareholders under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78n(a)) and Securities Exchange Act (SEC) Rules thereunder — post Virginia Bankshares, 137 ALR Fed 293.

§ 26-24-121.
Boards of directors.

The affairs of each domestic insurer shall be managed by a board of directors consisting of not less than five (5) nor more than twenty-one (21) directors.

Directors, other than initial directors named in the insurer’s articles of incorporation, shall be elected by the members or stockholders of a domestic insurer at the annual meeting of stockholders or members. Directors may be elected for terms of not more than five (5) years each and until their successors are elected and have qualified. If the directors are to be elected for terms of more than one (1) year, the insurer’s bylaws shall provide for a staggered term system under which the terms of a proportionate part of the members of the board of directors shall expire on the date of each annual meeting of stockholders or members.

A director of a mutual insurer shall be a policyholder thereof.

As to an insurer operating as an authorized insurer only in the state of Wyoming, a majority of the members of the insurer’s board of directors shall be citizens of and shall actually reside in this state.

Any executive committee of a board of directors shall consist of not less than three (3) directors, a majority of whom shall reside in this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136,§ 483; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-483; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-121; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2018 ch. 21, § 1, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (c), deleted “stock insurer shall be a stockholder thereof, and a director of a” following “A director of a.”

Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

§ 26-24-122.
Notice of changes of officers and directors.

An insurer shall promptly give the commissioner written notice of any change of personnel among its directors or corporate officers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 484; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-484; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-122; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-123.
Management in national emergency; purpose of emergency provisions.

The specific purpose of W.S.

26-24-124

through

26-24-126

is to facilitate the continued operation of domestic insurers if a national emergency is caused by an attack on the United States or by a nuclear, atomic or other disaster which makes it impossible or impracticable for an insurer to conduct its business in strict accord with applicable provisions of law, its bylaws or its charter.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 485; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-485; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-123; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-124.
Emergency bylaws.

The board of directors of any domestic insurer may at any time adopt emergency bylaws, subject to repeal or change by action of those having power to adopt regular bylaws for the insurer, which shall be operative during a national emergency and which may, notwithstanding any different provisions of the regular bylaws, or of the applicable statutes, or of the insurer’s charter, make any provision that may be reasonably necessary for the insurer’s operation during the period of the emergency.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 486; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-486; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-124; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-24-125.
Emergency provisions in lieu of bylaws.

If the board of directors of a domestic insurer does not adopt emergency bylaws, the following provisions are effective in case of a national emergency:

Three (3) directors constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at all board meetings;

Any board vacancy may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director;

If there are no surviving directors, but at least three (3) vice-presidents of the insurer survive, the three (3) vice-presidents with the longest term of service are the directors and possess all of the powers of the previous board of directors and any other powers granted under this chapter or by subsequently enacted legislation. By majority vote the emergency board of directors may elect other directors. If there are not at least three (3) surviving vice-presidents, the commissioner or designated person exercising the powers of the insurance commissioner of this state shall appoint three (3) persons as directors who possess all of the powers of the previous board of directors and any other powers granted under this chapter or by subsequently enacted legislation, and these persons by majority vote may elect other directors.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 487; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-487; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-125; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-24-126.
Emergency succession of officers; change of home office location.

The board of directors of a domestic insurer, by resolution, may provide that:

In case of a national emergency and in case of the death or incapacity of the president, the secretary or the treasurer of the insurer, that officer, or any of them, shall be succeeded in the office by the person named or described in a succession list adopted by the board of directors which:

May be on the basis of named persons or position titles;

Shall establish the order of priority; and

May prescribe the conditions under which the powers of the office shall be exercised.

In case of a national emergency the insurer’s home office or principal place of business shall be at a location specified in the resolution, except that the resolution may provide for alternate locations and establish an order of preference.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 488, 489; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-488, 26.1-489; W.S. 1977, §§ 26-29-126, 26-29-127; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-24-127.
Pecuniary interests of officers or directors prohibited.

Any officer or director, or any member of any committee or an employee of a domestic insurer, who is charged with the duty of investing or handling the insurer’s funds shall not:

Deposit or invest those funds except in the insurer’s corporate name;

Borrow the insurer’s funds;

Be pecuniarily interested in any loan, pledge or deposit, security, investment, sale, purchase, exchange, reinsurance or other similar transaction or property of the insurer except as a stockholder or member;

Take or receive to his own use any fee, brokerage, commission, gift or other consideration for or on account of any transaction made by or on behalf of the insurer.

No insurer shall guarantee any financial obligation of any of its officers or directors.

This section does not prohibit any director or officer, or member of a committee or employee from:

Becoming a policyholder of the insurer and enjoying the usual rights provided for its policyholders;

Participating as beneficiary in any pension trust, deferred compensation plan, profit sharing plan or stock option plan authorized by the insurer and to which he may be eligible; or

Receiving a reasonable fee for lawful services actually rendered to the insurer.

The commissioner, by regulation, may define and permit additional exceptions to the prohibition contained in subsection (a) of this section solely to enable payment:

Of reasonable compensation to a director who is not otherwise an insurer’s officer or employee; or

To a corporation or firm in which a director is interested, for necessary services performed or sales or purchases made to or for the insurer in the ordinary course of the insurer’s business and in the usual private professional or business capacity of the director, corporation or firm.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 490; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-490; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-128; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.